Arkansas, session 2025, SB312.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 20-8-107(d), concerning the prohibition on
adding new beds or expanding bed capacity of residential care facilities
under the authority of the Health Services Permit Agency, is amended to read
as follows:
(d)(1) Except as provided in subdivision (d)(2) of this section,
Beginning July 1, 2005, the Health Services Permit Agency may not accept
applications or requests for permits of approval to add new beds or to expand
existing bed capacity of residential care facilities.
(2)(A) A psychiatric residential treatment facility as defined
in § 9-28-402 is exempt from subdivision (d)(1) of this section and may add
new beds or expand existing bed capacity.
(B) A cap shall not be set on the number of beds or bed
capacity for psychiatric residential treatment facilities in this state.

*JMB388*
02/26/2025 9:00:07 AM JMB388

SB312
SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. TEMPORARY LANGUAGE. Expiration of
moratorium.
The mortarium on the construction or addition of any additional beds
within psychiatric residential treatment facilities beyond the current number
of permitted and licensed beds for the state on February 1, 2008, under 20
CAR § 255-605, shall expire on the effective date of this section.






























02/26/2025 9:00:07 AM JMB388